Illinois, session 104th, SB3095.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5adding Section 42 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/42 new)7    Sec. 42. Reciprocity.8    (a) Notwithstanding the licensing provisions of this Act, 9a nonresident may carry a concealed firearm in accordance with 10this Act if the nonresident:11        (1) is 21 years of age or older;12        (2) has in his or her immediate possession a valid 13    license or permit that is issued to him or her by a state 14    whose license or permit is recognized by the Illinois 15    State Police under subsection (b) of this Section and that 16    authorizes him or her to carry a concealed firearm; and17        (3) is a legal resident of the United States.18    (b) The Illinois State Police shall recognize as a valid 19license under this Act a valid permit or license issued by: (i) 20a state whose requirements to obtain a permit or license are 21substantially similar to the training requirements in Section 2275 of this Act or (ii) by any contiguous state with which 23Illinois has entered into a reciprocal agreement. The Illinois   SB3095- 2 -LRB104 18894 WRO 32339 b1State Police shall enter into a reciprocal agreement with 2Iowa, Missouri, Wisconsin, Indiana, or Kentucky if that state 3recognizes concealed carry licenses issued by Illinois.4    (c) A nonresident is subject to the same laws and 5restrictions with respect to carrying a concealed firearm as a 6resident who is licensed under this Act.7    (d) If a resident of another state who is the holder of a 8valid license or permit to carry a concealed firearm that is 9issued by another state and that is recognized by the Illinois 10State Police under subsection (b) establishes legal residence 11in this State, the license or permit shall be valid in this 12State for 90 days following the date on which the holder of the 13license or permit establishes legal residence in this State. 14For the purposes of this subsection (d), the person may 15establish legal residence in this State by:16        (1) registering to vote;17        (2) obtaining an Illinois driver's license or State 18    identification card; or19        (3) filing for a homestead tax exemption on property 20    in this State. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.